New Jersey, session 221, A816.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1 et seq.) or any other section of law to the contrary, the Department of Education shall provide to any school district that requests the information, the data for all school districts used to calculate State school aid pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) and P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.), including the data necessary to calculate and reconcile all school districts adequacy budgets, equalization aid, and local shares, and the details of any adjustments made when the calculated local share exceeds the adequacy budget for every such district in the State, and the software program algorithms used by the department to calculate State school aid, regardless of whether or not the department considers the software program to be proprietary. The department shall also provide a reconciliation, broken down by district, that demonstrates that total local share plus total equalization aid equals the total of all adequacy budgets Statewide in accordance with sections 10 and 11 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-52 and C.18A:7F-53). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.